Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska45-618
Licensee; change place of business; notify Secretary of State; new license; issuance; solicitor; employment terminated; return certificate.

If a licensed collection agency or its branch office changes the location of its place of business, the licensee shall forthwith notify the Secretary of State of such change and the Secretary of State shall thereupon issue a new license or branch office certificate, as the case may be, setting forth the new address. If the employment, by a licensee, of a solicitor holding a certificate is terminated, such certificate shall be forthwith turned over to the licensee by such solicitor and the licensee shall forthwith turn such certificate over to the Secretary of State for cancellation.

Laws 1963, c. 500, § 22, p. 1602;

R.S.1943, (1981), § 81-8,179;

Laws 1984, LB 471, § 18.